Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1056.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 121 of Title 76, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A peace officer, as defined in Section 99 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, employed by the state or any political


subdivision of this state who, under color of law, subjects or


causes to be subjected, including failing to intervene, any other


person to the deprivation of any individual rights that create


binding obligations on government actors secured by the Bill of

Req. No. 798 Page 1


Rights, Article II of the Oklahoma Constitution, shall be liable to


the injured party for legal or equitable relief or any other


appropriate relief.


B. Statutory immunities and statutory limitations on liability,


damages, or attorney fees shall not apply to claims brought pursuant


to this section. The Governmental Tort Claims Act shall not apply


to claims brought pursuant to this section.


C. Qualified immunity is not a defense to liability pursuant to


this section.


D. In any action brought pursuant to this section, a court


shall award reasonable attorney fees and costs to a prevailing


plaintiff. In actions for injunctive relief, a court shall deem a


plaintiff to have prevailed if the lawsuit of the plaintiff was a


substantial factor or significant catalyst in obtaining the results


sought by the litigation. When a judgment is entered in favor of a


defendant, the court may award reasonable costs and attorney fees to


the defendant for defending any claims the court finds frivolous.


E. The employer of the peace officer shall indemnify its peace


officer for any liability incurred by the peace officer and for any


judgment or settlement entered against the peace officer for claims


arising pursuant to this section; provided, however, if the employer


of the peace officer determines the peace officer did not act in


good faith and upon a reasonable belief that the action was lawful,


the peace officer shall be personally liable and shall not be

Req. No. 798 Page 2


indemnified by the employer of the peace officer for five percent


(5%) of the judgment or settlement or Twenty-five Thousand Dollars


($25,000.00), whichever is less. Notwithstanding any provision of


this section to the contrary, if the peace officer’s portion of the


judgment is not collectible from the peace officer, the employer of


the peace officer or insurance provider shall satisfy the full


amount of the judgment or settlement. The peace officer shall not


be indemnified by the employer for any monetary judgments or legal


expenses, including attorney fees, if the conduct of the peace


officer from which the claim arose constituted a criminal offense


and the peace officer was convicted of such criminal offense.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-798 TEK 1/16/2025 2:54:12 PM





















Req. No. 798 Page 3